incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Allamar/as__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asin</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasiin</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasii</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasa</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasa</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasis</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasiiguin</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasiidda</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasat</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasiid</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasiid</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rasiin</l>
          <r>as<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Máht/to__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ton</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uin</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tui</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>to</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiguin</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uide</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uid</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uid</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uin</l>
          <r>to<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bireha/š__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žžan</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččain</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žžii</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čča</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čča</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččas</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččaiguin</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččaide</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččat</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččaid</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččaid</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ččain</l>
          <r>š<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ta__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iguin</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Allamaras"><i>Allamar</i><par n="Allamar/as__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Amy"><i>Amy</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Aino"><i>Aino</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Áillohaš"><i>Áilloha</i><par n="Bireha/š__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Atlanta"><i>Atlanta</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Avdejeva"><i>Avdejeva</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Arja"><i>Arja</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Eva"><i>Eva</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Engebu"><i>Engebu</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Frelsesarmeá"><i>Frelsesarmeá</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Galleri"><i>Galleri</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Greta"><i>Greta</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Haapala"><i>Haapala</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hánnomaras"><i>Hánnomar</i><par n="Allamar/as__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gurli"><i>Gurli</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Holmi"><i>Holmi</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Husby"><i>Husby</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Honna"><i>Honna</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Jehova"><i>Jehova</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Into"><i>Into</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Jenna"><i>Jenna</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Joensuu"><i>Joensuu</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Klotshkova"><i>Klotshkova</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kero"><i>Kero</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kolombia"><i>Kolombia</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Johnny"><i>Johnny</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lago"><i>Lago</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kumari"><i>Kumari</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lahti"><i>Lahti</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lávrrohaš"><i>Lávrroha</i><par n="Bireha/š__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Li"><i>Li</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lazio"><i>Lazio</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mákredáža"><i>Mákredáža</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Luvlieluspie"><i>Luvlieluspie</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Martti"><i>Martti</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mátta-Georgia"><i>Mátta-Georgia</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Máhtto"><i>Máht</i><par n="Máht/to__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mihkkelaš"><i>Mihkkela</i><par n="Bireha/š__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mexico"><i>Mexico</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mo"><i>Mo</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Muri"><i>Muri</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Nia"><i>Nia</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Napoli"><i>Napoli</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Njárgasaš"><i>Njárgasa</i><par n="Bireha/š__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Nuorta-Sibirjá"><i>Nuorta-Sibirjá</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Betania"><i>Betania</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Birehaš"><i>Bireha</i><par n="Bireha/š__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Berta"><i>Berta</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Øfsti"><i>Øfsti</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Oslo"><i>Oslo</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Penkkari"><i>Penkkari</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Palestina"><i>Palestina</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Piura"><i>Piura</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ráipásaš"><i>Ráipása</i><par n="Bireha/š__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ragazzi"><i>Ragazzi</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ranttila"><i>Ranttila</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Rica"><i>Rica</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Rui"><i>Rui</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sámeradio"><i>Sámeradio</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Saami"><i>Saami</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Samvirkelága"><i>Samvirkelága</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Simi"><i>Simi</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Serengeti"><i>Serengeti</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sipola"><i>Sipola</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sokkisletta"><i>Sokkisletta</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sonera"><i>Sonera</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Suolomaras"><i>Suolomar</i><par n="Allamar/as__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sulitjelma"><i>Sulitjelma</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Syrjälä"><i>Syrjälä</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Tuomioja"><i>Tuomioja</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ursula"><i>Ursula</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vábu"><i>Vábu</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Turkki"><i>Turkki</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vieltojärvi"><i>Vieltojärvi</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Varjo"><i>Varjo</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vihko"><i>Vihko</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Walkeapää"><i>Walkeapää</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Yala"><i>Yala</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Bolla"><i>Bolla</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Christie"><i>Christie</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Company"><i>Company</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Eldorado"><i>Eldorado</i><par n="Ta__N_Prop"/></e>
